Illinois, session 104th, HB506.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Lodging Services Human Trafficking 5Recognition Training Act is amended by changing Section 1 as 6follows: 7    (820 ILCS 95/1)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 9Lodging Services Human Trafficking Recognition Training Act.10(Source: P.A. 101-18, eff. 6-20-19; 101-499, eff. 8-23-19.)